Utah statutes.
53B-8c-103.   Tuition waivers for surviving spouses and children of police officers and firefighters killed in the line of duty -- Qualifications -- Limitations.

(1)  Beginning in the 1997-98 academic year, and subject to the limitations in Subsections (2), (3), and (4) of this section, a state institution of higher education shall waive tuition for each child and surviving spouse of a Utah peace officer or Utah firefighter who has been killed or is killed in the line of duty if the individual meets the following requirements:

(a)  applies, qualifies, and is admitted as a full-time, part-time, or summer school student in a program of study leading to a degree or certificate;

(b)  is a resident student of the state as determined under Section 53B-8-102;

(c)  applies to the department for a waiver of tuition under this chapter and provides evidence satisfactory to the department that:

(i)  the applicant is the surviving spouse or child of a peace officer or firefighter who was killed in the line of duty;

(ii)  the course or courses for which the applicant is seeking a tuition waiver meet the requirements of Subsection (2); and

(iii)  the applicant meets the other requirements of this section;

(d)  for a child of a peace officer or firefighter killed in the line of duty, applies under Subsection (1)(c) for the first time before the age of 25;

(e)  is certified by the financial aid officer at the higher education institution as needing the tuition waiver in order to meet recognized educational expenses, with the understanding that if the applicant's family income, excluding any income from death benefits attributable to the peace officer's or firefighter's death, is below 400% of the poverty level under federal poverty guidelines, income from any death benefits accruing to the applicant as a result of the death may not be counted as family income in determining financial need under this Subsection (1)(e);

(f)  maintains satisfactory academic progress, as defined by the institution of higher education, for each term or semester in which the individual is enrolled, which may be measured by the definition used for federal student assistance programs under Title IV of the Higher Education Act of 1965; and

(g)  has not achieved a bachelor's degree and has received tuition reimbursement under this chapter for less than 124 semester credits or 180 quarter credits at an institution of higher education.

(2)  A child or surviving spouse of a peace officer or firefighter who was killed in the line of duty is eligible for a tuition waiver under this section of not more than nine semesters or the equivalent number of quarters.

(3)  Tuition shall be waived only to the extent that the tuition is not covered or paid by any scholarship, trust fund, statutory benefit, or any other source of tuition coverage available for a waiver under this chapter.

(4)  An institution of higher education shall waive tuition under this chapter only for courses that are applicable toward the degree or certificate requirements of the program in which the child or surviving spouse is enrolled.

